Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 504B.212, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Criminal history background check; nonresident tenant organizers. new text end new text begin A landlord may request a criminal history background check from the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension for a tenant organizer who is not a resident at the premises before the tenant organizer enters the premises or exercises any rights under this section. The tenant organizer must complete a criminal history consent form and provide payment to the landlord in an amount equal to the actual cost to the landlord for conducting the criminal history background check. A landlord may prohibit a tenant organizer from entering the premises or exercising the rights under this section if: new text end new text begin (1) the tenant organizer was convicted of a crime of violence, as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 5; or new text end new text begin (2) the tenant organizer refuses to consent to a criminal history background check. new text end